src/verbs/group-3-verbs.lexc
LEXICON Group3_Indicative_crire
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^cris			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^cris			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^crit			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^crivons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^crivez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^crivent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^crivais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^crivais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^crivait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^crivions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^criviez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^crivaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^crivis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^crivis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^crivit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^crivîmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^crivîtes		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^crivirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^crirai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^criras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^crira			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^crirons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^crirez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^criront			#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_crire
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^crive			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^crives			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^crive			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^crivions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^criviez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^crivent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^crivisse		#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^crivisses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^crivît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^crivissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^crivissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^crivissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_crire
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^crirais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^crirais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^crirait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^cririons		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^cririez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^criraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_crire
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^cris			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^crivons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^crivez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_enir
enir+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_enir;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_enir
+Inf:enir					#;
+PPre:enant					#;
+PPas:enu					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_enir;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_enir;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_enir;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_enir;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_enir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^ens				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^ens				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^ent				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^enons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^enez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ennent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^enais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^enais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^enait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^enions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^eniez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^enaient			#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^ins			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^ins			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^int			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^înmes			#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^întes 			#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^inrent			#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^endrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^endras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^endra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^endrons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^endrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^endront			#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_enir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^ienne			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^iennes			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^ienne			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^enions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^eniez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^ennent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^insse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^insses			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^înt				#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^inssions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^inssiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^inssent			#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_enir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^endrais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^endrais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^endrait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^endrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^endriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^endraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_enir
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^iens			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^enons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^enez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_courir
courir+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_courir;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_courir
+Inf:courir					#;
+PPre:courant				#;
+PPas:couru					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_courir;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_courir;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_courir;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_courir;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_courir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^cours			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^cours			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^court			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^courons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^courez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^courent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^courais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^courais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^courait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^courions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^couriez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^couraient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^courus			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^courus			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^courut			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^courûmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^courûtes 		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^coururent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^courrai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^courras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^courra			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^courrons		#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^courrez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^courront		#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_courir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^coure			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^coures			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^coure			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^courions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^couriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^courent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^courusse		#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^courusses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^courût			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^courussions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^courussiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^courussent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_courir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^courrais		#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^courrais		#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^courrait		#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^courrions		#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^courriez		#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^courraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_courir
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^cours			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^courons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^courez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_uire
uire+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_uire;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_uire
+Inf:uire					#;
+PPre:uisant				#;
+PPas:uit					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_uire;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_uire;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_uire;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_uire;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_uire
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^uis				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^uis				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^uit				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^uisons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^uisez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^uisent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^uisais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^uisais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^uisait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^uisions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^uisiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^uisaient		#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^uisis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^uisis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^uisit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^uisîmes		#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^uisîtes 		#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^uisirent		#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^uirai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^uiras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^uira			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^uirons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^uirez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^uiront			#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_uire
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^uise			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^uises			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^uise			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^uisions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^uisiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^uisent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^uisisse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^uisisses		#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^uisît			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^uisissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^uisissiez		#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^uisissent		#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_uire
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^uirais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^uirais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^uirait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^uirions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^uiriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^uiraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_uire
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^uis				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^uisons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^uisez			#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_tir
tir+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_tir;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_tir
+Inf:tir					#;
+PPre:tant					#;
+PPas:ti					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_tir;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_tir;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_tir;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_tir;

LEXICON Group3_Indicative_tir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^s				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^s				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^t				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^tons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^tez				#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^tent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^tais			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^tais			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^tait			#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^tions			#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^tiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^taient			#;

! Passé Simple
+PSim+P1+Sg:^tis			#;
+PSim+P2+Sg:^tis			#;
+PSim+P3+Sg:^tit			#;
+PSim+P1+Pl:^tîmes			#;
+PSim+P2+Pl:^tîtes 			#;
+PSim+P3+Pl:^tirent			#;

! Future Simple
+Fut+P1+Sg:^tirai			#;
+Fut+P2+Sg:^tiras			#;
+Fut+P3+Sg:^tira			#;
+Fut+P1+Pl:^tirons			#;
+Fut+P2+Pl:^tirez			#;
+Fut+P3+Pl:^tiront			#;

LEXICON Group3_Subjunctive_tir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^te				#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^tes				#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^te				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^tions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^tiez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^tent			#;

! Imparfait
+Imp+P1+Sg:^tisse			#;
+Imp+P2+Sg:^tisses			#;
+Imp+P3+Sg:^tît				#;
+Imp+P1+Pl:^tissions		#;
+Imp+P2+Pl:^tissiez			#;
+Imp+P3+Pl:^tissent			#;

LEXICON Group3_Conditional_tir
! Présent
+Pre+P1+Sg:^tirais			#;
+Pre+P2+Sg:^tirais			#;
+Pre+P3+Sg:^tirait			#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^tirions			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^tiriez			#;
+Pre+P3+Pl:^tiraient		#;

LEXICON Group3_Imperative_tir
! Présent
+Pre+P2+Sg:^s				#;
+Pre+P1+Pl:^tons			#;
+Pre+P2+Pl:^tez				#;

!=====
LEXICON Group3_suffix_mettre
mettre+Ver:0		Group3_Vinf_mettre;

LEXICON Group3_Vinf_mettre
+Inf:mettre					#;
+PPre:mettant				#;
+PPas:mis					#;
+Ind:0 	Group3_Indicative_mettre;
+Sub:0 	Group3_Subjunctive_mettre;
+Con:0 	Group3_Conditional_mettre;
+Impr:0	Group3_Imperative_mettre;

LEXICON Group3_stem
abst	Group3_suffix_enir;
appart	Group3_suffix_enir;
circonv	Group3_suffix_enir;
cont	Group3_suffix_enir;
contrev	Group3_suffix_enir;
conv	Group3_suffix_enir;
dev		Group3_suffix_enir;
disconv	Group3_suffix_enir;
dét		Group3_suffix_enir;
entret	Group3_suffix_enir;
interv	Group3_suffix_enir;
maint	Group3_suffix_enir;
obt		Group3_suffix_enir;
parv	Group3_suffix_enir;
prov	Group3_suffix_enir;
prév	Group3_suffix_enir;
redev	Group3_suffix_enir;
ret		Group3_suffix_enir;
rev		Group3_suffix_enir;
sout	Group3_suffix_enir;
subv	Group3_suffix_enir;
surv	Group3_suffix_enir;
t		Group3_suffix_enir;
v		Group3_suffix_enir;
